csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_IND_d.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: zagasininiwidogen
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: zagasinodogen
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: zagasininiwidog
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: zagasinodog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: atemagasininiwidogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: atemagasinodogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: atemagasininiwidog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinodog
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: zagadiniwidogen
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: zagadodogen
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: zagadiniwidog
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: zagadodog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: atemagadiniwidogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: atemagadodogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: atemagadiniwidog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: atemagadodog
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [zagasininigobaniin,zagasininigobanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [zagasinoogobaniin,zagasinoogobanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: zagasininigoban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: zagasinoogoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagasininigobaniin,atemagasininigobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagasinoogobaniin,atemagasinoogobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: atemagasininigoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinoogoban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [zagadinigobaniin,zagadinigobanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [zagadogobaniin,zagadogobanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: zagadinigoban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: zagadogoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagadinigobaniin,atemagadinigobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagadogobaniin,atemagadogobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: atemagadinigoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: atemagadogoban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: zagasininiwan
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: zagasinoon
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: zagasinini
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: zagasinoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: atemagasininiwan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: atemagasinini
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinoon
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: zagadiniwan
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: zagadoon
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: zagadini
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: zagad
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: atemagadiniwan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: atemagadoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: atemagadini
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: atemagad
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [zagasininiibaniin,zagasininiibanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [zagasinoobaniin,zagasinoobanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: zagasininiiban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: zagasinooban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagasininiibaniin,atemagasininiibanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagasinoobaniin,atemagasinoobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: atemagasininiiban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinooban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [zagadiniibaniin,zagadiniibanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [zagadoobaniin,zagadoobanen]
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: zagadiniiban
     zagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: zagadooban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagadiniibaniin,atemagadiniibanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagadoobaniin,atemagadoobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: atemagadiniiban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: atemagadooban
